th: วัสดุของซี่หวีสำหรับสาง: ทองเหลือง; สแตนเลสสตีล; เหล็ก (เหล็กกล้าคาร์บอน); อื่นๆ
pl: Materiał igieł powierzchni gręplarskiej: Mosiądz; Stal nierdzewna; Stal (stal węglowa); Inne
sl-SI: Material zobcev za mikanje: Medenina; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo (ogljikovo jeklo); Drugo
tr: Taranma yüzeyi pim malzemesi: Pirinç; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik (karbon çeliği); Diğer
ja: カーディング表面ピン止め素材: 真鍮; ステンレススチール; スチール (カーボンスチール); その他
cs: Materiál hrotů mykacího povrchu: Mosaz; Nerezová ocel; Ocel (uhlíková ocel); Jiné
de: Material der Kardiernadeln: Messing; Edelstahl; Stahl (Kohlenstoffstahl); Sonstige
bg-BG: Материал на иглите на кардиращата повърхност: Месинг; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана (въглеродна стомана); Друго
ro-RO: Material de fixare a suprafeței de cardare: Alamă; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel (oțel carbon); Altele
ru: Материал игл кардочесальной поверхности: Латунь; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь (углеродистая сталь); Другое
pt-PT: Material de pino da superfície de cardagem: Latão; Aço inoxidável; Aço (aço carbono); Outro
hr-HR: Materijal za grebenanje površine prikačeno: Mjed; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik (ugljični čelik); Ostalo
ko: 카딩 표면 핀 재질: 황동; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철(탄소강); 기타
fi: Karstapinnan piikkien materiaali: Messinki; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs (hiiliteräs); Muu
it: Superficie cardata con materiale Pin: Ottone; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio (acciaio al carbonio); Altro
sv: Kardningsytans nålmaterial: Mässing; Rostfritt stål; Stål (kolstål); Annat
en: Carding surface pin material: Brass; Stainless steel; Steel (carbon steel); Other
el: Υλικό καρφιών της επιφάνειας λαναρίσματος: Ορείχαλκος; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Ατσάλι (ανθρακοχάλυβας); Άλλο
zh-CN: 卡面针脚材质: 黄铜; 不锈钢; 钢（碳钢）; 其他
nl: Kaartoppervlak pin materiaal: Messing; Roestvrij staal; Staal (koolstofstaal); Overige
da: Nålmateriale i kardeflade: Messing; Rustfrit stål; Stål (kulstofstål); Andet
nb: Karde overflate pinnet materiale: Messing; Rustfritt stål; Stål (karbonstål); Annet
fr: Matière des picots de la surface de cardage: Laiton; Acier inoxydable; Acier (acier au carbone); Autre
vi: Chất liệu kim chải bề mặt: Đồng thau; Thép không gỉ; Thép (thép carbon); Khác
zh-TW: 梳理表面針材質: 黃銅; 不鏽鋼; 鋼 (碳鋼); 其他
pt-BR: Material dos pinos da superfície de cardagem: Latão; Aço inoxidável; Aço (aço carbono); Outro
lt-LT: Šukavimo paviršiaus kaiščių medžiaga: Žalvaris; Nerūdijantis plienas; Plienas (anglinis plienas); Kita
hu: Kártolófelületi tűk anyaga: Sárgaréz; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél (szénacél); Egyéb
es: Material de las púas de cardado: Latón; Acero inoxidable; Acero (acero al carbono); Otro
sk-SK: Materiál kolíkov pri mykaní: Mosadz; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ (uhlíková oceľ); Iný